Utah statutes.
16-16-804.   Election of directors and composition of board.
(1)  Unless the organic rules require a greater number:
(a)  the number of directors that must be patron members may not be fewer
than:
(i)  one, if there are two or three directors;
(ii)  two, if there are four or five directors;
(iii)  three, if there are six through eight directors; or
(iv)  1/3 of the directors if there are at least nine directors; and
(b)  a majority of the board of directors must be elected exclusively by
patron members.
(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative
association has investor members, the directors who are not elected
exclusively by patron members are elected by the investor members.
(3)  Subject to Subsection (1), the organic rules may provide for the election
of all or a specified number of directors by one or more districts or classes
of members.
(4)  Subject to Subsection (1), the organic rules may provide for the
nomination or election of directors by districts or classes, directly or by
district delegates.
(5)  If a class of members consists of a single member, the organic rules may
provide for the member to appoint a director or directors.
(6)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, cumulative voting for
directors is prohibited.
(7)  Except as otherwise provided by the organic rules, Subsection (5), or
Sections 16-16-303, 16-16-516, 16-16-517, and 16-16-809, member directors must
be elected at an annual members meeting.
